ext/spell/lv_LV.aff
SFX d Y 16
SFX d   0   ies      t
SFX d   t   šos      [^sz]t
SFX d   t   sies     [^sz]t
SFX d   t   simies   [^sz]t
SFX d   t   sieties  [^sz]t
SFX d   t   sities   [^sz]t
SFX d   t   īšos     [z]t
SFX d   t   īsies    [z]t
SFX d   t   īsimies  [z]t
SFX d   t   īsieties [z]t
SFX d   t   īsities  [z]t
SFX d   st  tīšos     [s]t
SFX d   st  tīsies    [s]t
SFX d   st  tīsimies  [s]t
SFX d   st  tīsieties [s]t
SFX d   st  tīsities  [s]t

SFX g Y 7
SFX g   t   jos     [āēīoū]t
SFX g   t   jies    [āēīoū]t
SFX g   t   jās     [āēīoū]t
SFX g   t   jāmies  [āēīoū]t
SFX g   t   jāties  [āēīoū]t
SFX g   0   os      [āēīoū]t
SFX g   t   šoties  [āēīoū]t

SFX 8 Y 11
SFX 8   t   u       t
SFX 8   t   i       [^gk]t
SFX 8   gt  dz      [g]t
SFX 8   kt  c       [k]t
SFX 8   t   0       t
SFX 8   t   am      t
SFX 8   t   at      t
SFX 8   t   iet     [^gk]t
SFX 8   gt  dziet   [g]t
SFX 8   kt  ciet    [k]t
SFX 8   t   ot      t

SFX O Y 9
SFX O   s     a     [s]
SFX O   s     am    [s]
SFX O   s     u     [s]
SFX O   s     ā     [s]
SFX O   s     0     [s]
SFX O   š     a     [š]
SFX O   š     am    [š]
SFX O   š     u     [š]
SFX O   š     ā     [š]

SFX i Y 8
SFX i   s     i     [s]
SFX i   s     iem   [s]
SFX i   s     us    [s]
SFX i   s     os    [s]
SFX i   š     i     [š]
SFX i   š     iem   [š]
SFX i   š     us    [š]
SFX i   š     os    [š]

SFX t Y 24
SFX t   s     iņ    [^gk]s
SFX t   gs    dziņ  [g]s
SFX t   ks    ciņ   [k]s
SFX t   s     iņš   [^gk]s
SFX t   s     iņa   [^gk]s
SFX t   s     iņam  [^gk]s
SFX t   s     iņu   [^gk]s
SFX t   s     iņā   [^gk]s
SFX t   gs    dziņš   [g]s
SFX t   gs    dziņa   [g]s
SFX t   gs    dziņam  [g]s
SFX t   gs    dziņu   [g]s
SFX t   gs    dziņā   [g]s
SFX t   ks    ciņš    [k]s
SFX t   ks    ciņa    [k]s
SFX t   ks    ciņam   [k]s
SFX t   ks    ciņu    [k]s
SFX t   ks    ciņā    [k]s
SFX t   š     iņš     [š]
SFX t   š     iņa     [š]
SFX t   š     iņam    [š]
SFX t   š     iņu     [š]
SFX t   š     iņā     [š]
SFX t   š     iņ      [š]

SFX v Y 16
SFX v   s     iņi   [^gk]s
SFX v   s     iņus  [^gk]s
SFX v   s     iņiem [^gk]s
SFX v   s     iņos  [^gk]s
SFX v   gs    dziņi   [g]s
SFX v   gs    dziņus  [g]s
SFX v   gs    dziņiem [g]s
SFX v   gs    dziņos  [g]s
SFX v   ks    ciņi    [k]s
SFX v   ks    ciņus   [k]s
SFX v   ks    ciņiem  [k]s
SFX v   ks    ciņos   [k]s
SFX v   š     iņi     [š]
SFX v   š     iņus    [š]
SFX v   š     iņiem   [š]
SFX v   š     iņos    [š]

SFX P Y 23
SFX P   is    a      [^bcdlmnpvtsz]is
SFX P   is    ja     [bpmv]is
SFX P   cis   ča     [c]is
SFX P   dis   ža     [d]is
SFX P   sis   ša     [s]is
SFX P   tis   ša     [^a][t]is
SFX P   is    a      [a][t]is
SFX P   zis   ža     [z]is
SFX P   nis   ņa     [^lsz][n]is
SFX P   lis   ļa     [^lsz][l]is
SFX P   lnis  ļņa    [l]nis
SFX P   snis  šņa    [s]nis
SFX P   znis  žņa    [z]nis
SFX P   llis  ļļa    [l]lis
SFX P   nnis  ņņa    [n]nis
SFX P   slis  šļa    [s]lis
SFX P   zlis  žļa    [z]lis
SFX P   s     m      [i]s
SFX P   s     0      [i]s
SFX P   is    ī      [i]s
SFX P   s     im     [lns]s
SFX P   s     i      [lns]s
SFX P   s     ī      [lns]s

SFX j Y 90
SFX j   is    ji     [bpmv]is
SFX j   is    i      [ģrķj]is
SFX j   tis   ši     [^a][t]is
SFX j   is    i      [a][t]is
SFX j   cis   či     [c]is
SFX j   dis   ži     [d]is
SFX j   zis   ži     [z]is
SFX j   sis   ši     [s]is
SFX j   nis   ņi     [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ļi     [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ļņi    [l]nis
SFX j   snis  šņi    [s]nis
SFX j   znis  žņi    [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ļļi    [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  ņņi    [n]nis
SFX j   slis  šļi    [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  žļi    [z]lis
SFX j   ns    ņi     [n]s
SFX j   is    ju     [bpmv]is
SFX j   is    u      [ģrķj]is
SFX j   tis   šu     [^a][t]is
SFX j   is    u      [a][t]is
SFX j   cis   ču     [c]is
SFX j   dis   žu     [d]is
SFX j   zis   žu     [z]is
SFX j   sis   šu     [s]is
SFX j   nis   ņu     [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ļu     [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ļņu    [l]nis
SFX j   snis  šņu    [s]nis
SFX j   znis  žņu    [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ļļu    [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  ņņu    [n]nis
SFX j   slis  šļu    [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  žļu    [z]lis
SFX j   ns    ņu     [n]s
SFX j   is    jiem   [bpmv]is
SFX j   s     em     [ģrķj]is
SFX j   tis   šiem   [^a][t]is
SFX j   is    iem    [a][t]is
SFX j   cis   čiem   [c]is
SFX j   dis   žiem   [d]is
SFX j   zis   žiem   [z]is
SFX j   sis   šiem   [s]is
SFX j   nis   ņiem   [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ļiem   [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ļņiem  [l]nis
SFX j   snis  šņiem  [s]nis
SFX j   znis  žņiem  [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ļļiem  [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  ņņiem  [n]nis
SFX j   slis  šļiem  [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  žļiem  [z]lis
SFX j   ns    ņiem   [n]s
SFX j   is    jus    [bpmv]is
SFX j   is    us     [ģrķj]is
SFX j   tis   šus    [^a][t]is
SFX j   is    us     [a][t]is
SFX j   cis   čus    [c]is
SFX j   dis   žus    [d]is
SFX j   zis   žus    [z]is
SFX j   sis   šus    [s]is
SFX j   nis   ņus    [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ļus    [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ļņus   [l]nis
SFX j   snis  šņus   [s]nis
SFX j   znis  žņus   [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ļļus   [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  ņņus   [n]nis
SFX j   slis  šļus   [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  žļus   [z]lis
SFX j   ns    ņus    [n]s
SFX j   is    jos    [bpmv]is
SFX j   is    os     [ģrķj]is
SFX j   tis   šos    [^a][t]is
SFX j   is    os     [a][t]is
SFX j   cis   čos    [c]is
SFX j   dis   žos    [d]is
SFX j   zis   žos    [z]is
SFX j   sis   šos    [s]is
SFX j   nis   ņos    [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ļos    [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ļņos   [l]nis
SFX j   snis  šņos   [s]nis
SFX j   znis  žņos   [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ļļos   [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  ņņos   [n]nis
SFX j   slis  šļos   [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  žļos   [z]lis
SFX j   ns    ņos    [n]s

SFX u Y 6
SFX u   is     ītis  [i]s
SFX u   is     īša   [i]s
SFX u   is     ītim  [i]s
SFX u   is     īti   [i]s
SFX u   is     ītī   [i]s
SFX u   is     īt    [i]s

SFX w Y 5
SFX w   is     īši   [i]s
SFX w   is     īšu   [i]s
SFX w   is     īšiem [i]s
SFX w   is     īšus  [i]s
SFX w   is     īšos  [i]s

SFX Q Y 3
SFX Q   s     m     [u]s
SFX Q   s     0     [u]s
SFX Q   us    ū     [s]

SFX k Y 3
SFX k   us    i     [s]
SFX k   us    iem   [s]
SFX k   us    os    [s]

SFX R Y 4
SFX R   0     s     a
SFX R   0     i     a
SFX R   a     u     a
SFX R   a     ā     a

SFX l Y 2
SFX l   a     ām    a
SFX l   a     ās    a

SFX r Y 20
SFX r   a     iņa   [^gk]a
SFX r   a     iņas  [^gk]a
SFX r   a     iņai  [^gk]a
SFX r   a     iņu   [^gk]a
SFX r   a     iņā   [^gk]a
SFX r   ga    dziņa   [g]a
SFX r   ga    dziņas  [g]a
SFX r   ga    dziņai  [g]a
SFX r   ga    dziņu   [g]a
SFX r   ga    dziņā   [g]a
SFX r   ka    ciņa   [^s]ka
SFX r   ka    ciņas  [^s]ka
SFX r   ka    ciņai  [^s]ka
SFX r   ka    ciņu   [^s]ka
SFX r   ka    ciņā   [^s]ka
SFX r   a     iņa     [s]ka
SFX r   a     iņas    [s]ka
SFX r   a     iņai    [s]ka
SFX r   a     iņu     [s]ka
SFX r   a     iņā     [s]ka

SFX x Y 8
SFX x   a     iņām   [^gk]a
SFX x   a     iņās   [^gk]a
SFX x   ga    dziņām   [g]a
SFX x   ga    dziņās   [g]a
SFX x   ka    ciņām   [^s]ka
SFX x   ka    ciņās   [^s]ka
SFX x   a     iņām    [s]ka
SFX x   a     iņās    [s]ka

SFX S Y 4
SFX S   0     s    e
SFX S   0     i    [e]
SFX S   e     i    [e]
SFX S   e     ē    [e]

SFX m Y 16
SFX m   e     u    [^bcdlmnpstvz]e
SFX m   e     ju   [bmpv]e
SFX m   ce    ču   [c]e
SFX m   de    žu   [d]e
SFX m   le    ļu   [^l]le
SFX m   lle   ļļu  [l]le
SFX m   ne    ņu   [^sz][n]e
SFX m   sne   šņu  [s]ne
SFX m   zne   žņu  [z]ne
SFX m   se    šu   [s]e
SFX m   te    šu   [^s]te
SFX m   te    tu   [^k]ste
SFX m   ste   šu   [k]ste
SFX m   ze    žu   [z]e
SFX m   e     ēm   [e]
SFX m   e     ēs   [e]

SFX s Y 5
SFX s   e     īte   [e]
SFX s   e     ītes  [e]
SFX s   e     ītei  [e]
SFX s   e     īti   [e]
SFX s   e     ītē   [e]

SFX f Y 3
SFX f   e     īšu   [e]
SFX f   e     ītēm  [e]
SFX f   e     ītēs  [e]

SFX T Y 3
SFX T   s     ij   [s]
SFX T   s     i    [s]
SFX T   s     ī    [s]
