ext/spell/lv_LV.dic
Asja/Rlrx
Edijs/Oitv
Edžus/Qk
Elga/Rlrx
Ernestīne/Smsf
Hermanis/Pjuw
Igors/Oitv
Imalda/Rlrx
Ingus/Qk
Kleopatra/Rlrx
Kotdivuāra/R
Lore/Smsf
Magnuss/Oitv
Malvīne/Smsf
Marina/Rlrx
Markus/Qk
Marlēne/Smsf
Mozus/Q
Rainis/P
Rigonda/Rlrx
Rolands/Oitv
Sentis/Pjuw
Spulģis/Pjuw
Tonija/Rlrx
Vidusāzija/R
Vladislavs/Oitv
Voldemārs/Oitv
Zemgus/Qk
Zenta/Rlrx
Zina/Rlrx
acetātceluloze/S
agrārvalsts/nT
aiznākt/+h8BIaJ(M5
aizsaule/msS
aizķert/6BJ+([hIdM5
akselbante/Smsf
alimentus/k
alķīmiķis/Pj
anodpārklājums/Oi
antivaronis/Pj
anulējums/Oi
apakšdelms/Oitv
apakšpunkts/Oitv
apbruņot/J+)b$dHgG{1BIM
apcept/d([+hJBI4e8M}
apdzīvojamāka/+Rl
apkakle/Smfs
apsautēt/BIbHgGd+1J)[${M
apsniegt/h(+JM8
aptrinoša/+Rl
aptīksmināt/b(+hIgcCJ[dB1M
apvidus/Qk
arodīpašība/Rl
atašejs/Oi
atbļāvušus/k
atdegt/a+h(IJBM84
atmodināt/b+MhJc[dB(Ig1C
atrist/e+(54Ih8FJM
atsūknēt/b$)+dI{MBgH[JG1
atvieglinājums/Oi
atšuve/Smsf
auglis/wujP
augstbūve/Sm
aukle/Smfs
bakhanālija/Rl
bakterioze/Sm
barot/+Ib{g$)GMHB1Jd
bilaterāls/oi
birojs/Oitv
blakts/nT
bruņukuģis/Pj
bulduris/Pj
bunte/Smfs
būvnoteikumus/k
cept/+(hIde}J8BM[4
cepure/Smsf
ceturtdiena/Rl
cielava/Rlrx
ciparnīca/Rlxr
cirvis/Pjwu
darbs/Oitv
debess/nT
definējums/Oi
diegs/Oitv
difūzs/oi
disciplīna/Rl
diskete/Smsf
distance/Sm
dižzirdzene/Sm
dubultslānis/Pj
dzimumpartneris/Pj
emigrante/Sm
fasetacs/Tn
fundaments/Oi
gadagājums/Oi
gadatirgus/Qk
glābēja/rRlx
gremoklis/Pj
griezīte/Sm
grāmatzīme/Sm
grūtāka/+lR
gudrelis/Pj
hakeris/Pjuw
hotelis/uPjw
iecirtušus/k
iedarbināt/b+hMcCgI(BJd1[
ienācējs/Oi
ieprecēt/+bMIgBcd[hJ(C1
ierist/+hFeIM(8J54
iežogojums/Oi
inicializēt/+{G)$IbgJd[HB1M
izdūrušus/k
izmaltāka/l+R
izmurmināt/b+[(ghIcBd1CMJ
iznākt/+aIM5B(J8h
izraudams/+oiO
izsaka/+l
izstāde/Smsf
izsviedrēt/+)$Ibg[G{MJdBH1
jēldzelzs/Tn
jūra/Rlrx
kabatdrāna/Rlrx
kabatlakats/Oitv
kapzeķe/Ssmf
karstums/Oitv
kaucmindiete/Sm
kaļķis/P
kečups/Oi
klepus/Q
klētsdurvis/Pj
kodolzemūdene/Sm
kombains/Oi
kovārnis/uwjP
krabis/wuPj
krustceļus/k
krustuguns/Tn
kuļmuca/Rl
leitis/Pj
lete/Sm
lidvāvere/Smsf
lietus/Qk
likvidatorisms/O
ludzānietis/Pj
lutināt/d+hbcgIJ([MCB1
lācēns/Oitv
lāse/mfSs
līguminterese/Sm
maksimumstunda/Rl
malduguns/nT
mednis/Pjuw
medus/Q
meitēns/Oitv
melderis/Pjuw
musturis/Pj
muša/Rlrx
mācējs/Oi
māja/rlxR
nadzene/Sm
naukšēnietis/Pj
neatbildētājs/Oi
nenosacītība/Rl
neļķe/Smsf
noauklēt/+Id[gG)$bHJ{MB1
nokrāvušus/k
nonākt/+aIMJ5B(h8
noskricelēt/+M{GIdJ[bgH$B1
nostrēbt/+[IdJBeM4
noviltotājs/Oi
novitāte/Sm
nočērkstama/R+l
nātre/Smsf
padebess/nT
padegt/(+hdBJ8I4aM
painformētājs/Oi
palus/k
palīdzība/R
pamudināt/+bJC[I(Bdg1cMh
pamājot/+b){JdGHg$IB1M
papīrs/Oitv
patmīlis/Pj
paukšķis/wujP
pauris/Puwj
pazode/Sm
personāls/Oio
pielīgot/+g$JGb{I)HMB1d
piemāvušus/k
pienene/Smfs
piepildītāka/Rl+
pieslampāt/[+Gb$gMdBI)1{JH
piesniegt/hM+J(8
pilnbārda/Rl
pindzele/Sfsm
pipars/Oitv
pirtskuris/Pj
pretendentvalsts/nT
priekšpuse/Sm
primārs/oaYi
pārbrauciens/Oi
pārlīdušus/k
pārmiecēt/J+Ig)G1dBHb{[$M
pārnākt/Ih+a(JB58M
pārtaisīt/+Ib(J[cgdhMB1C
pīpis/Pj
rasetne/Sm
raudulis/jwuP
rausis/Pjwu
ravētājs/Oitv
redzamāka/+Rl
riešama/+lR
rijkuris/Pj
robežupe/Ssmf
robežvalsts/nT
rīve/fmSs
sagraizīt/hcJ[IB(Md+1bgC
saknitušus/k
sakopotājs/Oi
salna/rxlR
saraidīt/+1g[Jb(IhMcBdC
sarīkojums/Oi
savulkanizēt/+$bGd){I1gBHJ[M
sašļūkt/+Ih%68M5Bad(J
segums/Oitv
skaldauglis/Pj
skrūve/smSf
slauķis/wujP
slieksnis/Pwuj
slējušus/k
sniegpulkstenis/Pj
solokarjera/Rl
spazma/Rl
spiedze/Smsf
spilvens/Oitv
spāre/smSf
stabule/Smsf
starpstāvs/Oi
starpvalsts/Tn
svainis/uwjP
svečturis/wjPu
sārtums/Oitv
sētsvidus/Qk
sūneklis/Puwj
tirgus/Qk
tranzītceļš/Oi
trenažieris/Pj
tume/fmSs
tupināt/+b[(hcgIJMdB1C
tīrums/itO
ugunspuķe/Smsf
uzkvēlināt/C+c[JbMh(IdB1g
uzmanītājs/Oi
uznākt/IM}5+[aB(8hJ
uzslējušus/k
uzņemējdarbība/R
uzņēmējvalsts/Tn
vadonis/Pjuw
vadzis/jwuP
vagonete/Sm
vecmāmuļa/Rlrx
veldre/Sm
velosoma/Rlrx
veterinārfeldšeris/Pj
vidusjosla/Rrxl
viltus/Q
vārgdienis/wjuP
vēsts/nT
vīruss/Oitv
ziloņmāte/Smsf
zīmulis/uwPj
Āris/Pjuw
Šarlote/Smsf
čiepstulis/Pj
ķekarains/oaYi
ķekars/Oitv
šveicietis/Pj
šķibīt/+d$BHGIM)bJg1
ūdensroze/Smsf
žākle/Smsf
